Tennessee, session 114, SB0143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
68-1-2701. Subject to appropriations, the department of health shall provide free
diapers to a Tennessee resident who is a new mother or a working parent or guardian of a child
less than two (2) years old upon the resident's request. The department shall prominently
display on the department's website instructions for requesting free diapers. This section does
not apply to a resident or guardian of a resident child who participates in the state's free diaper
program as a recipient of the TennCare medicaid program or a successor to the program
provided for in the Medical Assistance Act of 1968, compiled in title 71, chapter 5, or as an
enrollee in the CoverKids program or a successor to the program provided for in the CoverKids
Act of 2006, compiled in title 71, chapter 3, part 11.
68-1-2702. The department of health shall collaborate with the department of human
services, and other state agencies as the department deems appropriate, to create a public
health campaign dedicated to providing diapers to new mothers and working parents or
guardians using funds specifically appropriated for this purpose during the 2025-2026 fiscal
year.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "public high school" and substituting instead "public school, including a public charter
school,".
SB0143
000093
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) "Public charter school" has the same meaning as defined in § 49-13-104;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417(b), is amended by deleting
"Each LEA is authorized to" and substituting instead "Each LEA and public charter school shall"
and by inserting "regularly used by students in grades four through twelve (4-12)" immediately
after "all women's and girl's bathrooms and locker rooms".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-417, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
(c) The state shall reimburse each LEA and public charter school that provides
feminine hygiene products pursuant to this section in an amount equal to the cost of the
products paid by the LEA or public charter school pursuant to this section.
(d) The department of health shall collaborate with the state board of education,
and other state agencies as the department deems appropriate, to create a public health
campaign dedicated to encouraging individuals and nonprofit organizations to contribute
or drop off feminine hygiene products to eligible schools.
SECTION 6. Section 1 of this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it. All other sections of this act take effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it,
and apply to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 000093